Utah statutes.
78B-2-203.   When letters patent or grants declared void.

When letters patent or grants of real property issued or made by the state are declared void by a court of competent jurisdiction, an action for the recovery of the property shall be brought either by the state, or by any subsequent patentee or grantee of the property, his heirs or assigns, within seven years after such determination.

